apertium-ain.ain.lexd
# Morphological Transducer for Ainu

# Part of speech categories
# <n>                          # Noun
# <v>                          # Verb
# <adv>                        # Adverb
# <adj>                        # Adjective
# <pn>                         # Pronoun
# <det>                        # Determiner
# <cnjsub>                     # subordinating conjunction
# <cnjcoo>                     # co-ordinating conjunction
# <prt>                        # Particle
# <pp>                         # post position
# <np>                         # proper noun 

# Noun tags
# <abs>                        # Abstract qualities
# <m>                          # Noun male gender
# <f>                          # Noun female gender
# <mg>                         # Noun male god gender
# <mf>                         # Noun male or female gender
# <end>                        # Noun affinity tag ("=my dear x")
# <hon>                        # Noun honorable tag ("=my honored x")
# <px1sg>                      # First person singular possessive
# <px2sg>                      # Second person singular possessive
# <px1pl>                      # First person plural possessive
# <px2pl>                      # Second person plural possessive
# <nmlz>                       # Nominalization
# <rn>                         # relational noun
# <bn>                         # bound noun

# Determiner tags
# <ndet>                       # numeral determiner
# <ndom>                       # nominal demonstrative
# <adom>                       # anaphoric demonstrative


# Verb tags
# <pasv1>                      # Passive Voice chi
# <pasv2>                      # Passive Voice a
# <tv>                         # Transitive Verb
# <iv>                         # Intransitive Verb
# <vaux>                       # Auxiliary Verb
# <vx>                         # Verbalization
# <tvx>                        # Make verb transitive
# <cop>                        # copula
# <acaus> 		       # acausative
# <caus> 		       # causative
# <apass>		       # apassive
# <refl> 		       # reflexive


# Tense tags
# <pres>                       # Present Tense

# Aspect tags
# <perf>                       # Perfective Aspect

# Mood tags
# <pri>                        # Indicative Mood
# <infr>                       # Inferential Mood
# <comp>		       # Comparative Mood (should)
# <chrt>		       # Cohortitative Mood

# Person tags
# <p1>                         # First Person
# <p2>                         # Second Person
# <p3>			       # Third Person
# <p4.                         # Fourth Person
# <2pS>				# Second person subject

# Clitic tags
# <cli>                        # Clitic
# <top>                        # Topic marker
# <quot>		       # Quotation Clitic

# Adjective tags
# <cmp>                       # Comparative
# <sup>                        # Superlative
# <adjx>                       # Adjectivization

# Article tags
# <def>                        # Definite Article

# Number morphology
# <pl>                         # Plural
# <sg>                         # Singular
# <num>			       # Number

# Other symbols
# >                             # Morpheme boundary
# <dim>                        # Diminutive Particle
# <int>                        # Intensifying Particle  
# <ev>                         # Evidentiality
# <exc>                        # Exclamation
 	                       # Space

# Punctuation
# <sent>                       # Sentence marker
# <guio>    		       # Hyphen
# <cm>       		       # Comma
# <apos>                       # Apostrophe
# <rquot>                      # Quote marker (right hand side) 
# <lquot>                      # Quote marker (left hand side) 
# <rpar>                       # Parenthetical marker (right hand side) 
# <lpar>                       # Parenthetical marker (left hand side) 

# Archiphonemes
# {I}                          # can be イ or ヒ or null

# {i}                          # can be i or null

# {Mm}                         # mu mm or null
# {Tt}                         # tu tt or null
# {Kk}                         # ku kk or null
# {t}                          # small tsu or null

# {w}                          # ウ or null (for epenthesis)
# {pe}                         # pe or null
# {K}                          # ka, ki, ku, ke, or ko

# {U}                          # all sorts of stuff

###############################################################################
###                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         ###
###############################################################################

PATTERNS

Conjunction
Noun
Verb
Determiner
Auxiliary
PostPosition
Particle
Nominalizer
Exclamation
Punctuation
Pronoun
ProperNoun
Clitic
Adverb
Number

PATTERN Noun
[:ク] NounRoot [<n><cn><pos>:イヒ]
:NounInfl-Prefix NounRoot NounInfl-Prefix:
NounRoot NounInfl-Suffix
:NounPlural(1)[utara] NounRoot[utara] [<n><pl>:] :NounPlural(2)[utara]
:NounPlural(1)[U]     NounRoot[U]     [<n><pl>:] :NounPlural(2)[U]
:NounPlural(1)[preU]  NounRoot[preU]  [<n><pl>:] :NounPlural(2)[PreU]
:NounPlural(1)[Nu]    NounRoot[Nu]    [<n><pl>:] :NounPlural(2)[Nu]
:NounPlural(1)[Irreg] NounRoot[Irreg] [<n><pl>:] :NounPlural(2)[Irreg]
NounRoot DiminutiveNounInfl Diminutive
:NounInfl-Relational(1) RelationalNounRoot NounInfl-Relational(1): :NounInfl-Relational(2)

LEXICON NounInfl-Prefix

<n><det><ind>:シネ\ 
<n><det><def>:ネイ\ 
<n><m>:ピンネ\ 
<n><f>:マㇳネ\ 
<n><mg>:オッカイ\ 
<n><sg>:シネ\ 

LEXICON NounInfl-Suffix
<n><vz>:>コロ
<n><vz>:>カラ
<n><end1>:>\ トノケ
<n><end2>:>\ ポ
<n><hon>:>\ ニㇱパケ
<n><poss>:>{w}ェ
<n>:

LEXICON NounPlural(2)
:ウ> :>\ ウタラ[utara]
: :>{U}[U]
:ウ> :[preU]
: :>ヌ[Nu]
: :[Irreg]


LEXICON NounInfl-Relational(2)
<n><rn><pos><p1><sg>:エン :
<n><rn><pos><p3><sg>: :ア

LEXICON DiminutiveNounInfl
<n>:
<pn><px1sg><mf>:>コロ

LEXICON Diminutive
<dim>:>ポ

LEXICON CopulaStem
ネ:ネ

PATTERN Copula
CopulaStem [<v><cop>:]
[:ア] CopulaStem [<v><cop><p4>:]

PATTERN Verb
VerbStemPersonNumber > VerbSuffix-ClassVI > VerbPersonalSuffix
:Passive VerbStem Passive: [<nmlz>:>\ ㇷ゚]

:Passive VerbRoot[tv] [<v><tv>:] Passive:
[:エ>] VerbRoot[iv] [<v><iv><tvx>:]
VerbRoot[iv] [<v><iv><advz>:>ノ]

VerbStem Diminutive

PATTERN VerbStem
VerbRoot[tv] [<v><tv>:]
VerbRoot[iv] [<v><iv>:]

PATTERN VerbStemIII
VerbStem
:VerbPrefix-ClassIII VerbStem VerbPrefix-ClassIII:

PATTERN VerbStemII
VerbStemIII
:VerbPrefix-ClassII VerbStemIII VerbPrefix-ClassII:

PATTERN VerbStemI
VerbStemII
:VerbPrefix-ClassI VerbStemII VerbPrefix-ClassI:

PATTERN VerbStemPersonNumber
:VerbSubjectPrefix VerbObjectPrefix VerbStemI VerbSubjectPrefix:
:VerbSubjectPrefixNoObj VerbStemI VerbSubjectPrefixNoObj:

LEXICON Passive
<pasv1>:チ>
<pasv2>:ア>

LEXICON VerbPrefix-NoPers
<sup>:イヨッタ\ >
<comp>:ナア\ >
<int>:イ>

LEXICON VerbSubjectPrefix
<sg><2pS>:エチ>
<pl><2pS>:エ>
<1pS>
<1pS>:イ>
<p4>:ア>

LEXICON VerbSubjectPrefixNoObj
<p1><sg>:ク>
<p2><pos>:エ>

LEXICON VerbObjectPrefix

:エ>
:エチ>
:イ>

LEXICON RegVerbInfl
<nmlz><abs>:>\ イ
<nmlz><abs>:>\ ヒ
<vaux><vpres>:シリネ
<pl>:パ

LEXICON VerbPrefix-ClassI 
# applicative
<appl>:エ
<appl>:コ
<appl>:オ

LEXICON VerbPrefix-ClassII 
<apass>:イ
<refl>:ヤイ
<acaus>:シ

LEXICON VerbPrefix-ClassIII
<appl>:エ
<appl>:コ
<appl>:オ

LEXICON VerbSuffix-ClassVI 
<caus>:>レ
<caus>:>テ

LEXICON VerbPersonalSuffix
<p4>:アン


###############################################################################
###                          L E X I C O N                                  ###
###############################################################################

LEXICON NounRoot

エ:エ # a noun
チ:チ #
エチ:エチ #
ク:ク #
イセ:イセ #
ポンペ:ポンペ #
チカㇷ゚:チカㇷ゚ #
オッカィ:オッカィ #
チイカナィ:チイカナィ #
チㇱナィ:チㇱナィ #
ト゚カラ:ト゚カラ #
イキリ:イキリ # a seam 
アット゚ㇱ:アット゚ㇱ # cloth 
シセイ:シセイ # a house
チセ:チセ # house
ハウ:ハウ # the voice
ホニ:ホニ # the stomach
カヤ:カヤ # a sail
アイアイ:アイアイ[utara] #
アイヌ:アイヌ[utara] # human/the Ainu
アシキペㇳ:アシキペㇳ[U] #
アㇳ:ア{Tt}[U] #
アㇺ:ア{Mm}[U] #
イクㇱペ:{i}クㇱペ[preU] #
イタㇰ:イタ{Kk}[U] #
イリワㇰ:イリワㇰ[preU] #
ウㇺマ:ウㇺマ[utara] #
クㇳ:ク{t}[U] #
ケマ:ケマ[preU] #
チェㇷ゚:チェㇷ゚[Nu] #
ニシ:ニシ[U] #
ニマキ:ニマキ[preU] #
フラ:フラ[Nu] #
ペ:ペ{pe}[Irreg] #
ペㇳ:ペㇳ[Irreg] #
チコイキㇷ゚:チコイキㇷ゚ #
チセイ:チセイ #
シウェンテㇷ゚:シウェンテㇷ゚ #
クル:クル #
チェㇷ゚:チェㇷ゚[Nu] #
クッペ:クッペ[preU] #
セタ:セタ #
アアㇰ:アアㇰ
アトノ:アトノ
アニㇱ:アニㇱ
アポホ:アポホ
アミチ:アミチ
アユポ:アユポ
アㇰ:アㇰ
ト゚レㇱ:ト゚レㇱ
シㇰ:シㇰ # eye
シキ:シキ # eye TODO: Fix possessive noun (see above entry)
カムィ:カムィ
パ:パ
ル:ル
ニㇱパ:ニㇱパ
ポネ:ポネ # bone
シタ:シタ # dog
ウパㇱ:ウパㇱ # snow
イㇽ:イㇽ # family/kin
フチ:フチ # grandmother/old woman
フㇺイ:フㇺイ # sound (possessive)
アペ:アペ # fire
ワッカ:ワッカ # water
ケㇺ:ケㇺ # blood
アト゚ィ:アト゚ィ # sea/ocean
アマㇺ:アマㇺ # meal (lit. rice/cereals)
アㇷ゚ト:アㇷ゚ト # rain
マチヤ:マチヤ # town
ヌㇷ゚:ヌㇷ゚ # field
オㇱケ:オㇱケ # inside (noun locative)
ヌプリ:ヌプリ # mountain
モンラィケ:モンラィケ # work
ケラ:ケラ # taste
パロ:パロ # mouth (possessive)
イタピルㇷ゚:イタピルㇷ゚ # cloth
カヤ:カヤ # sail
チュㇰ:チュㇰ # autumn
クㇽ:クㇽ # person
ポト゚ㇽケㇱ:ポト゚ㇽケㇱ # bruise
オヤシㇺ:オヤシㇺ # day after tomorrow
オヤシㇺシㇺケ:オヤシㇺシㇺケ # 2 days after tomorrow
ケマ:ケマ # leg
サパ:サパ # head
シケ:シケ # luggage
プィ:プィ # hole
スㇺ:スㇺ # oil
イト゚ンナㇷ゚:イト゚ンナㇷ゚ # ant
カィテ:カィテ # anchor
サポ:サポ # older sister
チㇷ゚:チㇷ゚ # ship
ト゚ィ:ト゚ィ # stomach
チュㇷ゚:チュㇷ゚ # sun/moon/month
ニペㇰ:ニペㇰ # light (moon)
#ムン:ムン # grass NEW
ラㇳチャコ:ラㇳチャコ # light
アィアィ:アィアィ # baby
タペト:タペト # businessman
ノㇳキリ:ノㇳキリ # chin
トゥカㇽ:トゥカㇽ # seal
ポト゚ㇽケス:ポト゚ㇽケス # bruise
ケマ:ケマ # leg
チキㇼ:チキㇼ # animal's leg
ルウェ:ルウェ # trace/footprint
トコㇺポネ:トコㇺポネ # ankle
ウルペㇳ:ウルペㇳ # toe
アントゥキ:アントゥキ # red bean
ポッペ:ポッペ # sweat
サパ:サパ # head
プィ:プィ # hole
ユピ:ユピ # older brother
サポ:サポ # older sister
シラゥ:シラゥ # horsefly
スㇺ:スㇺ # oil
フィペ:フィペ # grease/fat
アマㇺ:アマㇺ # rice
イチェン:イチェン # money
ヤ:ヤ # net
クト゚:クト゚ # fish trap
アㇷ゚ト:アㇷ゚ト # rain
ト:ト # day
ルヤㇺペ:ルヤㇺペ # storm
ニㇲクㇽ:ニㇲクㇽ # cloud
カゥカゥ:カゥカゥ # hail
イト゚ンナㇷ゚:イト゚ンナㇷ゚ # ant
カㇺピ:カㇺピ # paper
ポㇷ゚:ポㇷ゚ # blister
ウㇺマ:ウㇺマ # horse
ムンチロ:ムンチロ # millet
アィペ:アィペ # abalone
オッカイポ:オッカイポ # boy
メノコ:メノコ # woman
ニテㇲ:ニテㇲ # raft
カィテ:カィテ # anchor
ト゚ㇲ:ト゚ㇲ # net/rope
マウェ:マウェ # breath
ト゚ミ:ト゚ミ # war
トパット゚ミ:トパット゚ミ # burglary
ヘㇺパㇰ:ヘㇺパㇰ # how many
スィ:スィ # times
メㇺ:メㇺ # pond
スマ:スマ # stone
ルィ:ルィ # grinding stone
スシルㇷ゚:スシルㇷ゚ # pumice stone
エポタラ:エポタラ # doctor
ナィ:ナィ # stream
トペニ:トペニ # maple tree
チュルㇷ゚:チュルㇷ゚ # january
エマゥリ:エマゥリ # strawberry
ヘㇺパラ:ヘㇺパラ # when
トケィ:トケィ # clock
アシㇰネ:アシㇰネ # five
シㇺプィ:シㇺプィ # well
オマキルㇲ:オマキルㇲ # locust
イメル:イメル # lightning
エㇽメタㇺプ:エㇽメタㇺプ # wart
アユㇲニ:アユㇲニ # korean raspberry
エモ:エモ # potato
アパウㇲタ:アパウㇲタ # doctor
タンヌ:タンヌ # dolphin
イヨㇷ゚:イヨㇷ゚ # container
ワッカ:ワッカ # water
ポンチェㇷ゚:ポンチェㇷ゚ # sardine
パサ:パサ # carriage
カ:カ # top
テㇲカㇽ:テㇲカㇽ # errand
ペコ:ペコ # cow
ニス:ニス # mortar
ピリ:ピリ # vortex
シノㇳチャ:シノㇳチャ # song
イㇼ:イㇼ # kin
チェㇷ゚:チェㇷ゚ # fish
ラㇺ:ラㇺ # scales
ミㇺ:ミㇺ # fish meat
ノカ:ノカ # picture
イモㇰ:イモㇰ # bait
ニテㇰ:ニテㇰ # branch
ノコ:ノコ # saw
ヌマト゚シ:ヌマト゚シ # collar
アㇳコチ:アㇳコチ # fishtail
ユㇰ:ユㇰ # deer
アピㇼ:アピㇼ # deer tail
カㇻク:カㇽク # nephew
ヤ:ヤ # land/shore
ホㇿケゥ:ホㇿケゥ # wolf
アワンキ:アワンキ # fan
シㇼ:シㇼ # appearance
セㇾマカセㇽマカ # behind
トピㇱキ:トピㇱキ # malaria
ウオサ:ウオサ # weaving instrument
アチャ:アチャ # uncle
パロ:パロ # mouth
オハゥ:オハゥ # soup
アキヒ:アキヒ # younger brother
ウナㇻペ:ウナㇽペ # aunt
クㇳ:クㇳ # sash
ケㇲ:ケㇲ # end
ホク:ホク # husband
ト゚リ:ト゚リ # pole
セィ:セィ # shell
ネ:ネ # what
マッカチ:マッカチ # girl
ネン:ネン # who
ネㇷ゚:ネㇷ゚ # what
ムイェ:ムイェ # sheaf
パㇻカ:パㇻカ # shelf
オッケオッケ:オッケオッケ # stick
ウォㇿ:ウォㇿ # water (old)
ニ:ニ # firewood
オㇿ:オㇿ # noun locative
ウタㇻ:ウタㇻ # kin
タスㇺ:タスㇺ # sickness
オルㇱペ:オルㇱペ # story
Eq<n>:Eq  # units
kg<n>:kg  # units
m2<n>:m2  # units
q<n>:q  # units
テ<n><nloc>:テ  # here
モシㇼ:モシㇼ # land
アパ:アパ # door
エスペラント:エスペラント # Esperanto
アイヌイタㇰ:アイヌイタㇰ # Ainu Language
アイヌウタㇻ:アイヌウタㇻ # Ainu People
アイヌタイム:アイヌタイム # Ainu Times

LEXICON RelationalNounRoot
サㇺ:サㇺ

LEXICON Clitic

アナㇰ<cli><top>:アナㇰ
アナㇰネ<cli><top>:アナㇰネ
ヒケ<cli><nmlz>:ヒケ  # with regards to X

LEXICON Pronoun

アオカィ<n><pn>:アオカィ

LEXICON VerbRoot
